Utah statutes.
63M-1-1601.   Title -- Definitions.

(1)  This part is known as the "Rural Development Act."

(2)  As used in this part:

(a)  "Office" means the Governor's Office of Economic Development.

(b)  "Program" means the Rural Development Program.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

